Wyoming, session 2025, HB0203.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-4-403(a), (b), (c)(intro) and by
creating a new subsection (e) is amended to read:
HB0203

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0468

16-4-403. Meetings to be open; participation by
public; minutes; recordings.

(a) All meetings of the governing body of an agency
are public meetings, open to the public at all times,
except as otherwise provided. To the extent practicable,
public meetings shall provide live audio or video access to
the meeting and shall provide for remote participation by
members of the public. No action of a governing body of an
agency shall be taken except during a public meeting
following notice of the meeting in accordance with this
act. Action taken at a meeting not in conformity with this
act is null and void and not merely voidable.

(b) A member of the public is not required as a
condition of attendance at any meeting to register his
name, to supply information, to complete a questionnaire,
or fulfill any other condition precedent to his attendance.
A person seeking recognition at the meeting may be required
to give his name and affiliation. If an agency provides a
timed public comment period for a specific agenda item or
for general public comment, the public comment period shall
HB0203

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0468
not be closed until the timed public comment period listed
on the agenda has elapsed. An agency that does not specify
a timed public comment period for a specific agenda item
shall allow a reasonable amount of time per agenda item for
members of the public to provide public comment.

(c) Each agency shall compile minutes for each public
meeting. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection
and in W.S. 16-4-405(b), the minutes from the meeting shall
be made available to the public on the website of the
agency or at another location that is accessible to the
public. Minutes of a meeting:

(e) Meetings that permit live audio or video access
to the meeting by members of the public as provided in
subsection (a) of this section shall be recorded. The
unaltered original audio or video recording of a public
meeting made for whatever purpose by or at the direction of
the agency shall be made available to the public on the
website of the agency or at another location that is
accessible to the public. No agency shall prohibit or
restrict the broadcast or audio or video recording of a
public meeting unless the agency reasonably determines that
HB0203

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0468
the broadcast or recording would cause a disruption of the
meeting.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0203